src/numeral-sme-lex.txt
LEXICON GOLBMALOGI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%>#lohki%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%>#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>n#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>n#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:%>#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:%>#logi%> NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:%>#lot%> NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:%>X4#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:%>#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:%>X5jn#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ess+Attr:%>n#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:%>X4#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:%>X4#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:%>#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>X4#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd9#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd9#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:%>X5jde#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>X5jd9#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>X5jgujn#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:%>X4t#lot%> K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:%>X5jd#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:%>X5jd#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:%>X5jd#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:%>X5jn#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4t#logi%>n K ;


LEXICON VIHTTA
 +Num+Sg+Nom:htta%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:hta%> K ;
 +Num+Ess:htta%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:htta%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:đa%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:đa»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Loc:đa%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:đa%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:đa%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:đa%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:đa%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:htti%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:đa%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:đa%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:đa%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:đa%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:đa%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:đa%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:đa%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:đa%>jgujn K ;

LEXICON VIHTTANUPPELOHKAI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:htta%>#nuppe#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:htta%>#nuppe#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:htta%>#nuppe#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:htta%>#nuppe#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:đa%>#nuppe#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:đa%>#nuppe#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:đa%>#nuppe#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:đa%>#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:htta%>#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:đa%>jn#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ess+Attr:htta%>n#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:đa%>#nuppe#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:đa%>#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:htta%>#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:đa%>#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:đa%>#nuppe#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:đa%>#nuppe#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:htta%>#nuppe#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:đa%>#nuppe#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:đa%>jn#nuppe#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:htta%>#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:htta%>#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:htta%>#nuppe#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:đa%>jn#nuppe#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:htta%>#nuppe#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:htta%>#nuppe#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:đa%>t#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr:đa%>jd#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:đa%>jd#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:đa%>jd#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:đa%>jd#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:đa%>jn#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:đa%>t#nuppe#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:đa%>jd#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:đa%>jd#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:đa%>jd#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:đa%>jd#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:đa%>t#nuppe#logi%>n K ;


LEXICON VIHTTAGOALMMATLOHKAI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:htta%>#goalmmát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:htta%>#goalmmát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:htta%>#goalmmát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:htta%>#goalmmát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:đa%>#goalmmát#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:đa%>#goalmmát#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:đa%>#goalmmát#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:đa%>#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:htta%>#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:đa%>#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:đa%>#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:htta%>#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:đa%>jn#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ess+Attr:htta%>n#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:đa%>#goalmmát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:đa%>#goalmmát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:htta%>#goalmmát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:đa%>#goalmmát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:đa%>jn#goalmmát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:htta%>#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:htta%>#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:htta%>#goalmmát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:đa%>jn#goalmmát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:htta%>#goalmmát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:htta%>#goalmmát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:đa%>t#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr:đa%>jd#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:đa%>jd#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:đa%>jd#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:đa%>jd#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:đa%>jn#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:đa%>t#goalmmát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:đa%>jd#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:đa%>jd#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:đa%>jd#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:đa%>jd#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:đa%>t#goalmmát#logi%>n K ;


 LEXICON VIHTTANJEALJATLOHKAI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:htta%>#njealját#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:htta%>#njealját#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:htta%>#njealját#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:htta%>#njealját#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:đa%>#njealját#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:đa%>#njealját#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:đa%>#njealját#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:đa%>#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:htta%>#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:đa%>#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:đa%>#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:htta%>#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:đa%>jn#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ess+Attr:htta%>n#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:đa%>#njealját#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:đa%>#njealját#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:htta%>#njealját#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:đa%>#njealját#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:đa%>jn#njealját#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:htta%>#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:htta%>#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:htta%>#njealját#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:đa%>jn#njealját#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:htta%>#njealját#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:htta%>#njealját#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:đa%>t#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr:đa%>jd#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:đa%>jd#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:đa%>jd#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:đa%>jd#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:đa%>jn#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:đa%>t#njealját#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:đa%>jd#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:đa%>jd#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:đa%>jd#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:đa%>jd#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:đa%>t#njealját#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON 11TO99F
vihttanuppelohkái:vi VIHTTANUPPELOHKAI ;
vihttagoalmmátlohkái:vi VIHTTAGOALMMATLOHKAI ;
vihttanjealjátlohkái:vi VIHTTANJEALJATLOHKAI ;
guhttanuppelohkái:gu VIHTTANUPPELOHKAI ;
guhttagoalmmátlohkái:gu VIHTTAGOALMMATLOHKAI ;
guhttanjealjátlohkái:gu VIHTTANJEALJATLOHKAI ;
LEXICON 111TO119
vihttanuppelohkái:vi VIHTTANUPPELOHKAI ;
vihttagoalmmátlohkái:vi VIHTTAGOALMMATLOHKAI ;
vihttanjealjátlohkái:vi VIHTTANJEALJATLOHKAI ;
guhttanuppelohkái:gu VIHTTANUPPELOHKAI ;
guhttagoalmmátlohkái:gu VIHTTAGOALMMATLOHKAI ;
guhttanjealjátlohkái:gu VIHTTANJEALJATLOHKAI ;
LEXICON CUODI
čuođigolbmalogi:čuođi#golbma GOLBMALOGI ;
oktačuohtigolbmalogi:okta#čuohti#golbma GOLBMALOGI ;
čuohtigolbmalogi:čuohti#golbma GOLBMALOGI ;
LEXICON num-imprecise
máŋgalogi:máŋ'ga GOLBMALOGI ;
beal% vihtta+Use/Sub:beal#vi VIHTTA ; !time
beal% guhtta+Use/Sub:beal#gu VIHTTA ; !time
beal% vihtta:beal% vi VIHTTA ; !time
beal% guhtta:beal% gu VIHTTA ; !time
